Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-5432
Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, how cited.

Sections 44-5432 to 44-5444 shall be known and may be cited as the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act.

Laws 2025, LB77, § 1.